Washington statutes.
RCW 41.60.110

Employee teamwork incentive program—Evaluation of savings.

To qualify for a teamwork incentive program award for its employees, a team must identify the net savings, revenue, or both, accomplished during the project period. The calculations of net savings, revenue, or both, are not final until approved by the agency head, who may modify the team's calculations. The board may by rule establish criteria to be used in calculating net savings, revenue, or both.

[ 1999 c 50 s 8; 1993 c 467 s 5; 1989 c 56 s 3; 1987 c 387 s 6; 1985 c 114 s 5; 1982 c 167 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 467: See note following RCW 41.60.010.

Effective date—1989 c 56: See note following RCW 41.60.041.

Effective date—1985 c 114: See note following RCW 41.60.015.

Severability—1982 c 167: See note following RCW 41.60.015.